New York, session 2025-2026, A7826.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 590 of the labor law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 13 to read as follows: 3 13. Benefits for federal employees. If a claimant's employment was 4 terminated by their federal employer on or after January twentieth, two 5 thousand twenty-five without a credible claim of misconduct to justify 6 such termination, the claimant shall be presumed eligible for unemploy- 7 ment insurance benefits under this article. Such eligibility shall be 8 subject to review by the department. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire February 10 1, 2029 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed 11 repealed. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11494-01-5